Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1204
Emergency protective custody; dangerous sex offender determination; written certificate; contents.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a mental health professional who, upon evaluation of a person admitted for emergency protective custody under section 71-919, determines that such person is a dangerous sex offender shall execute a written certificate as provided in subsection (2) of this section not later than twenty-four hours after the completion of such evaluation. A copy of such certificate shall be immediately forwarded to the county attorney.

(2) The certificate shall be in writing and shall include the following information:

(a) The subject's name and address, if known;

(b) The name and address of the subject's spouse, legal counsel, guardian or conservator, and next of kin, if known;

(c) The name and address of anyone providing psychiatric or other care or treatment to the subject, if known;

(d) The name and address of any other person who may have knowledge of the subject's mental illness or personality disorder who may be called as a witness at a mental health board hearing with respect to the subject, if known;

(e) The name and address of the facility or jail in which the subject is being held for emergency protective custody and evaluation;

(f) The name and work address of the certifying mental health professional;

(g) A statement by the certifying mental health professional that he or she has evaluated the subject since the subject was admitted for emergency protective custody and evaluation; and

(h) A statement by the certifying mental health professional that, in his or her clinical opinion, the subject is a dangerous sex offender and the clinical basis for such opinion.

(3) In the case of a subject domiciled within Indian country who is taken into emergency protective custody by a law enforcement officer under tribal law, a mental health professional who, upon evaluation of such person, determines that such person is a dangerous sex offender shall execute appropriate written documentation in a format provided by the tribe not later than twenty-four hours after the completion of such evaluation. A copy of such certificate shall be immediately forwarded to the person designated by the tribe.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 60;

Laws 2024, LB1288, § 27;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 122.